Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-126
United States Morrill Fund; source; use.

The United States Morrill Fund shall consist of all money appropriated by the United States to this state for its university to aid instruction, and to furnish the facilities for instruction, in certain branches in accordance with the provisions of an Act of Congress approved August 30, 1890, entitled An act to apply a portion of the proceeds of the public lands to the more complete endowment and support of the colleges for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts established under the provisions of an Act of Congress approved July 2, 1862, and acts supplemental thereto. The said fund shall be applied exclusively to the uses and purposes prescribed by the Act or Acts of Congress relating thereto, and the fund is hereby appropriated accordingly, and shall at all times be subject to the orders of the Board of Regents for the purpose specified by Act of Congress only.

Laws 1869, § 21, p. 177;

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 57;

Laws 1899, c. 76, § 1, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 7104;

C.S.1922, § 6736;

C.S.1929, § 85-122;

R.S.1943, § 85-126.